California statutes. Education Code
(c) The occupancy rate for 10 percent or more of the dwelling units within the vicinity of the new schoolsite equals or exceeds 1.5 persons per room, excluding bathrooms, hallways, and porches.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 574, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

35278.

(a) If a school district or community college district has acquired a new schoolsite containing residential dwelling units, the local governing agency, community college district, or eligible nonprofit corporation may, consistent with this article, acquire real property for the purpose of new schoolsite replacement housing and utilize or convey the property according to this article, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The local governing agency has determined that an extreme shortage of affordable housing exists in the vicinity of the new schoolsite.

(2) The real property to be used for replacement housing is acquired by the local governing agency, community college district, or an eligible nonprofit corporation in the vicinity of a new schoolsite, or in an area designated in the local governing agency’s replacement housing plan adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), within two years of the school district’s acquisition of a possessory right to the new schoolsite.

(3) The combined area of the real property to be used for replacement housing acquired by the local governing agency, community college district, or an eligible nonprofit corporation pursuant to this article does not include any portion of the new schoolsite and does not, in acreage, exceed 150 percent of the area acquired by the school district for the new schoolsite.

(b) (1) A local governing agency or eligible nonprofit corporation may rehabilitate, develop, or construct residential facilities on the property for the purpose of providing new schoolsite replacement housing as set forth in this article.

(2) A community college district or eligible nonprofit corporation may acquire real property for the purpose of new schoolsite replacement housing only from a willing seller.

(c) Notwithstanding Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code or any other provision of law, a local governing agency, community college district, or eligible nonprofit corporation that has acquired real property for new schoolsite replacement housing pursuant to this article may convey the property to an affiliated public agency for the purpose of providing new schoolsite replacement housing. An affiliated public agency that has acquired real property pursuant to this section may rehabilitate, develop, or construct residential facilities on the property for the purpose of providing new schoolsite replacement housing in compliance with this article.

(d) Notwithstanding Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code or any other provision of law, a local governing agency, community college district, eligible nonprofit corporation, or an affiliated public agency, that has acquired real property for new schoolsite replacement housing pursuant to this article, may sell, lease for no more than 99 years, jointly develop, exchange, subdivide, transfer, assign, pledge, encumber by mortgage, deed of trust, or otherwise, or otherwise dispose of the real property or any interest in that property, or any portion thereof, for the purpose of providing new schoolsite replacement housing through the rehabilitation, development, or construction of residential facilities or combined residential and commercial facilities on that property.

(e) (1) Any disposition of real property, pursuant to subdivision (d), acquired for new schoolsite replacement housing pursuant to this article shall be in furtherance of a replacement housing plan. The local governing agency, or community college district shall adopt a replacement housing plan for disposition of real property pursuant to this article, which shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) The replacement housing plan shall include all of the following:

(i) A statement of the general location of housing to be developed pursuant to this section.

(ii) A description of the means of financing the development.

(iii) A finding that the actions to be taken pursuant to the plan do not require approval of the voters pursuant to Article XXXIV of the California Constitution, or that the approval has been or will be obtained.

(iv) A specification of the number of dwelling units housing persons and families of low income and persons and families of moderate income, respectively, that are planned for construction or rehabilitation.

(v) Provisions to ensure that persons displaced by the acquisition of a new schoolsite, and the acquisition of the new schoolsite replacement housing property pursuant to this article, shall have a right of first refusal for the purchase or rental of dwelling units developed in the replacement housing.

(vi) A description of any facilities for commercial use to be constructed in combination with the replacement housing.

(B) The number of dwelling units to be developed on the combined area of real property acquired pursuant to this article will be equal to a prescribed percentage, as determined by the local governing agency, or community college district, but in no event less than the sum of both of the following:

(i) Seventy-five percent of the total number of dwelling units demolished or to be demolished in connection with construction or expansion of school facilities on the new schoolsite.

(ii) The total number of dwelling units on the new schoolsite replacement housing property to be acquired pursuant to this article.

(C) Unless the local governing agency or community college district prescribes a greater number pursuant to subparagraph (D), the number of dwelling units developed on the property acquired for new schoolsite replacement housing pursuant to this article that are available at affordable housing costs or affordable rents shall be greater than, or equal to, the lesser of either of the following:

(i) A number equal to 50 percent of the dwelling units developed on the property acquired for new schoolsite replacement housing pursuant to this article.

(ii) The number of households of persons and families of low, or moderate, income displaced by the acquisition of the new schoolsite property and by the acquisition of the property for new schoolsite replacement housing pursuant to this article.

(D) A local governing agency, community college district, or eligible nonprofit corporation may require that all or any portion of the dwelling units, in addition to those required under subparagraph (C), be available at affordable housing cost or affordable rent to persons and families in lower income categories, including, persons and families of low income, very low income, or extremely low income. This section does not prohibit a local governing agency, community college district, or eligible nonprofit corporation from participating financially or otherwise to enable any housing developed pursuant to this article to serve households of lower income if the need for that housing is identified in, and consistent with, the replacement housing plan.

(2) For a reasonable period of time prior to adopting the replacement housing plan, the agency or community college district shall make available a draft of the proposed plan for review and comment by public agencies and the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 495, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

35278.5.

This article does not require a local governing agency to acquire real property, develop replacement housing, or perform any other act pursuant to this article. A local governing agency may, at its option, take action pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 574, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. School Maintenance [35290. - 35293.]

35290.

The governing board of any school district shall maintain schools and classes as provided by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35291.

The governing board of any school district shall prescribe rules not inconsistent with law or with the rules prescribed by the State Board of Education, for the government and discipline of the schools under its jurisdiction. The governing board of each school district which maintains any of grades 1 through 12, inclusive, may, at the time and in the manner prescribed by Sections 48980 and 48981, notify the parent or guardian of all pupils registered in schools of the district of the availability of rules of the district pertaining to student discipline.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1032, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

35291.5.

(a) On or before December 1, 1987, and at least every four years thereafter, each public school may, at its discretion, adopt rules and procedures on school discipline applicable to the school. For schools that choose to adopt rules pursuant to this article, the school discipline rules and procedures shall be consistent with any applicable policies adopted by the governing board and state statutes governing school discipline. In developing these rules and procedures, each school shall solicit the participation, views, and advice of one representative selected by each of the following groups:

(1) Parents.

(2) Teachers.

(3) School administrators.

(4) School security personnel, if any.

(5) For junior high schools and high schools, pupils enrolled in the school.

Meetings for the development of the rules and procedures should be developed and held within the school’s existing resources, during nonclassroom hours, and on normal schooldays.

The final version of the rules and procedures on school discipline with attendant regulations may be adopted by a panel comprised of the principal of the school, or his or her designee, and a representative selected by classroom teachers employed at the school.

It shall be the duty of each employee of the school to enforce the rules and procedures on school discipline adopted under this section.

(b) The governing board of each school district may prescribe procedures to provide written notice to continuing pupils at the beginning of each school year and to transfer pupils at the time of their enrollment in the school and to their parents or guardians regarding the school discipline rules and procedures adopted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Each school may file a copy of its school discipline rules and procedures with the district superintendent of schools and governing board on or before January 1, 1988.

(d) The governing board may review, at an open meeting, the approved school discipline rules and procedures for consistency with governing board policy and state statutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1032, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

35291.7.

Additional employees may not be hired and substitute teachers may not be utilized in order to comply with the requirements of Sections 35291 and 35291.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 87, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

35292.

The governing board of any school district shall visit each school in its district at least once each term, and examine carefully into the management, needs, and conditions of the schools. In any school district which employs district or city superintendents of schools, it shall either visit the schools or provide that they shall be visited by the district or city superintendent of schools or his assistants.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35292.5.

(a) Every public and private school maintaining any combination of classes from kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Every restroom shall at all times be maintained and cleaned regularly, fully operational, and stocked at all times with toilet paper, soap, and paper towels or functional hand dryers.

(2) The school shall keep all restrooms open during school hours when pupils are not in classes, and shall keep a sufficient number of restrooms open during school hours when pupils are in classes.

(b) (1) On or
 before July 1, 2026, each school district, county office of education, and charter school, including charter schools operating in a school district facility pursuant to Section 47614, maintaining any combination of classes from grades 1 to 12, inclusive, shall comply with the following for each of its schoolsites that, before July 1, 2026, has more than one female restroom and
 more than one male restroom designated exclusively for pupil use, excluding restrooms designated for pupils in transitional kindergarten or kindergarten:

(A) Provide and maintain at least one all-gender restroom for pupil use that meets the following requirements:

(i) Has signage identifying the bathroom facility as being open to all genders and in conformity with Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ii) Is available for pupil use, consistent with the requirements of subdivision (a), as unlocked, unobstructed, easily accessible by any pupil, and consistent with existing pupil access to sex-segregated
 restrooms.

(iii) Is consistent with the requirements pursuant to Section 35292.6.

(iv) Is available during school hours and school functions when pupils are present.

(B) Designate a staff member to serve as a point of contact for implementation of this section.

(C) Post a notice regarding the requirements of this paragraph in a prominent and conspicuous location outside at least one all-gender restroom, including contact information for the person designated as a point of contact pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(2) A school district, county office of education, or charter school may use an
 existing restroom to satisfy the requirements of this subdivision if it ensures that all pupils have restrooms that are in easily accessible locations and the existing restroom otherwise complies with the requirements in paragraph (1).

(3) This subdivision shall be subject to compliance review pursuant to Section 253.

(4) The department shall post on its internet website guidance for implementation of this subdivision, including, but not limited to, examples of signage and best practices.

(5) This subdivision shall not supplant subdivision (f) of Section 221.5. Use of an all-gender restroom by a pupil shall be voluntary and pupils
 shall not be required to use an all-gender restroom.

(6) This subdivision shall not preclude a schoolsite that does not have more than one female restroom and more than one male restroom designated exclusively for pupil use, excluding restrooms designated for pupils in transitional kindergarten or kindergarten, from identifying and making easily accessible, a restroom for pupil use that satisfies the requirements of this subdivision.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a school may temporarily close a restroom as necessary (1) for
 a documented
 pupil safety
 concern, (2) for an immediate threat to pupil safety, or (3) to repair the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 227, Sec. 3.   (SB 760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

35292.6.

(a) On or before the start of the 2024–25 school year, a public school, including a school operated by a school district, county office of education, or charter school, maintaining any combination of classes from grades 3 to 12, inclusive, shall stock the school’s restrooms at all times with an adequate supply of menstrual products, available and accessible, free of cost, in all women’s restrooms and all-gender restrooms, and in at least one men’s restroom.

(b) A public school described in subdivision (a) shall not charge for any menstrual products provided to pupils.

(c) A public school described in subdivision (a) shall post a notice regarding the requirements of this section in
 a prominent and conspicuous location in every restroom required to stock menstrual products, available and accessible, free of cost, pursuant to this section. This notice shall include the text of this section and contact information, including an email address and telephone number, for a designated individual responsible for maintaining the requisite supply of menstrual products.

(d) For purposes of this section, “menstrual products” means menstrual pads and tampons for use in connection with the menstrual cycle.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 421, Sec. 3.   (AB 230)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

35293.

The governing board of any school district shall maintain all of the elementary day schools established by it, and all of the day high schools established by it with equal rights and privileges as far as possible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Earthquake Emergency Procedures [35295. - 35297.]

35295.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Because of the generally acknowledged fact that California will experience moderate to severe earthquakes in the foreseeable future, increased efforts to reduce earthquake hazards should be encouraged and supported.

(b) In order to minimize loss of life and disruption, it is necessary for all private elementary schools and high schools to develop school disaster plans and specifically an earthquake emergency procedure system so that pupils and staff will act instinctively and correctly when an earthquake disaster strikes.

(c) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to authorize the establishment of earthquake emergency procedure systems in kindergarten and grades 1 through 12 in all private schools in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 895, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

35296.

The governing board of each private school shall establish an earthquake emergency procedure system in every private school building under its jurisdiction having an occupant capacity of 50 or more pupils or more than one classroom. A governing board may work with the Office of Emergency Services and the Seismic Safety Commission to develop and establish the earthquake emergency procedure systems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 71.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

35297.

The earthquake emergency procedure system shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) A school building disaster plan, ready for implementation at any time, for maintaining the safety and care of students and staffs.

(b) A drop procedure. As used in this article, “drop procedure” means an activity whereby each student and staff member takes cover under a table or desk, dropping to his or her knees, with the head protected by the arms, and the back to the windows. A drop procedure practice shall be held at least once each school quarter in elementary schools and at least once a semester in secondary schools.

(c) Protective measures to be taken before, during, and following an earthquake.

(d) A program to ensure that the students and that both the certificated and classified staff are aware of, and properly trained in, the earthquake emergency procedure system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 448, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Scholarship and Loan Funds [35310. - 35319.]

35310.

The governing board of any school district may establish and maintain a scholarship and loan fund, to be administered by a committee composed of the members of the governing board of the school district, the school district superintendent, and such other community, faculty, administrative, and student representatives as the governing board shall determine.

The governing board shall, by rules and regulations, determine the terms of office and the method of selection of such community, faculty, administrative, and student representatives.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35311.

The superintendent of school district shall be the chairman of the committee and shall be the chief executive officer of the fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35312.

The committee shall meet at least once each fiscal year and at such other times as it may be called into session by the chairman.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35313.

The committee may accept on behalf of, and in the name of, the fund, such gifts, donations, bequests, and devises as are made for the purposes of the fund. Such gifts, donations, bequests, and devises may be made subject to such conditions or restrictions as the committee may prescribe.

Any donor to the fund may impose conditions to his gift, donation, bequest, or devise. The committee shall review all such conditions and make a recommendation to the governing board as to the compatibility of such conditions with the intent and purpose of the fund. The governing board shall have the authority to prohibit the committee from accepting any proposed donation to the fund if conditions with respect to the gift, donation, bequest, or devise are incompatible with the intent and purpose of the fund, as determined by the governing board.

Except as provided in this section, in no event shall the approval of any state agency be a prerequisite to acceptance by the committee of any gift, donation, bequest, or devise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35314.

Money in the fund shall be deposited in a bank or other institution whose accounts are federally insured, and any money so deposited shall be in an account or accounts fully covered by that insurance.

The committee shall establish and maintain procedures to identify clearly all money in the fund and its separate and distinct impressed trusts, if any, and from whom and to whom the money was received and disbursed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 115, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

35315.

All money in the fund shall be available for making interest-free loans for educational advancement, for scholarship, or for grants-in-aid to eligible persons. An eligible person for such loans shall be any of the following:

(a) A bona fide organization of a school under the jurisdiction of the governing board of the school district.

(b) An enrollee at a school under the jurisdiction of the governing board of the school district.

(c) A graduate of a school under the jurisdiction of the governing board of the school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35316.

An applicant for a loan from the fund shall make application therefor in accordance with reasonable rules and regulations established by the governing board of the school district, provided that the rules and regulations shall not include any conditions limiting eligibility on account of the characteristics listed in Section 220.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

35317.

All expenses in the administration of the fund including, but not limited to, operating costs, audits, promotion of the fund, and physical housing for the committee, shall be a proper charge against the funds of the school district and the annual budget of the school districts shall include funds for such expenses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35318.

The governing board of the school district shall arrange for an annual audit of the fund in the same manner as prescribed in Section 41020.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35319.

The chief executive officer of the fund shall make periodic reports, but not less frequently than annually, to the governing board of the school district with respect to the status and activity of the fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Excursions and Field Trips [35330. - 35332.]

35330.

(a) The governing board of a school district or the county superintendent of schools of a county may:

(1) Conduct field trips or excursions in connection with courses of instruction or school-related social, educational, cultural, athletic, or school band activities to and from places in the state, any other state, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country for pupils enrolled in elementary or secondary schools. A field trip or excursion to and from a foreign country may be permitted to familiarize pupils with the language, history, geography, natural sciences, and other studies relative to the district’s course of study for pupils.

(2) Engage instructors, supervisors, and other personnel to
 contribute their services over and above the normal period for which they are employed by the district, if necessary, and provide equipment and supplies for the field trip or excursion.

(3) Transport by use of district equipment, contract to provide transportation, or arrange transportation by the use of other equipment, of pupils, instructors, supervisors, or other personnel to and from places in the state, another state, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country where those excursions and field trips are being conducted, provided that, when district equipment is used, the governing board shall secure liability insurance, and if travel is to and from a foreign country, liability insurance shall be secured from a carrier licensed to transact insurance business in the foreign country.

(4) Provide supervision of pupils involved in field trips or excursions by certificated
 employees of the district.

(b) (1) A pupil shall not be prevented from making the field trip or excursion because of lack of sufficient funds. To this end, the governing board shall coordinate efforts of community service groups to supply funds for pupils in need.

(2) A group shall not be authorized to take a field trip or excursion authorized by this section if a pupil who is a member of an identifiable group will be excluded from participation in the field trip or excursion because of lack of sufficient funds.

(c) (1) The attendance or participation of a pupil in a field trip or excursion authorized by this section shall be considered attendance for the purpose of crediting attendance for apportionments from the State School Fund in the fiscal year. Credited attendance
 resulting from a field trip or excursion shall be limited to the amount of attendance that would have accrued had the pupils not been engaged in the field trip or excursion.

(2) Credited attendance shall not exceed 10 schooldays except in the case of pupils participating in a field trip or excursion in connection with courses of instruction, or school-related educational activities, and that are not social, cultural, athletic, or school band activities.

(d) All persons making the field trip or excursion shall be deemed to have waived all claims against the district, a charter school, or the State of California for injury, accident, illness, or death occurring during or by reason of the field trip or excursion. All adults taking out-of-state field trips or excursions and all parents or guardians of pupils taking out-of-state field trips or excursions shall sign a statement waiving
 all claims.

(e) Transportation allowances shall not be made by the Superintendent for expenses incurred with respect to field trips or excursions that have an out-of-state destination. A school district that transports pupils, teachers, or other employees of the school district in schoolbuses within the state and to destinations within the state, pursuant to the provisions of this section, shall report to the Superintendent on forms prescribed by him or her the total mileage of schoolbuses used in connection with educational excursions. In computing the allowance to a school district for regular transportation there shall be deducted from that allowance an amount equal to the depreciation of schoolbuses used for the transportation in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the Superintendent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 49.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

35331.

(a) The governing board of any school district conducting excursions and field trips pursuant to this article shall provide, or make available, medical or hospital service, or both, for pupils of the district injured while participating in any excursion or field trip under the jurisdiction of, or sponsored or controlled by, the district or the authorities of any school of the district.

(b) (1) The medical or hospital service, or both, described in subdivision (a) shall be provided, or made available, through any of the following:

(A) One or more nonprofit membership corporations defraying the cost of medical or hospital service, or both.

(B) One or more group, blanket, or individual policies of accident insurance from an
 authorized insurer.

(C) A self-insurance program of the school district.

(2) The cost incurred by the school district pursuant to this subdivision may be paid from the funds of the district, or by the insured pupil or his or her parent or guardian.

(3) The membership may be taken in, or the insurance may be purchased from, only those corporations or insurers that are authorized to do business in this state. If the coverage described in this subdivision is to be provided through a self-insurance program of the school district, claims may be paid from a fund established for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 89, Sec. 6.   (AB 2081)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

35332.

No transportation by air may be provided under this article unless the transportation by air is provided by any of the following: (a) aircraft owned and operated by the state or federal government; (b) chartered or regularly scheduled aircraft operated exclusively by an air carrier or foreign air carrier as defined in subdivisions (3) and (19) of Section 101 of Title 1 of the “Federal Aviation Act of 1958” (Public Law 85-726; 72 Stat. 731) engaged in air transportation as defined in subdivision (10) of the same section while there is in force a certificate or permit issued by the Civil Aeronautics Board of the United States, or its successor, authorizing such air carrier to engage in such transportation; or (c) chartered or regularly scheduled aircraft of a passenger air carrier as defined pursuant to Section 2741 of the Public Utilities Code that is authorized to engage in transportation by air in the State of California by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 2739) of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13.5. School Camps [35335. - 35335.]

35335.

The governing board of any elementary, high, or unified school district may charge a fee for school camp programs, provided that payment of such fee is not mandatory. No pupil shall be denied the opportunity to participate in a school camp program because of nonpayment of the fee.

The amount of the fee may not exceed the difference between any state, local, or federal funds generated by such a program and the cost of the services actually provided.

For purposes of this section a school camp program is one which is operated pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 8760) of Chapter 4 of Part 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Authority to Transport Pupils [35350. - 35351.]

35350.

No governing board of a school district shall require any student or pupil to be transported for any purpose or for any reason without the written permission of the parent or guardian.

This section shall not apply to the transportation of a student or pupil in an emergency arising from illness or injury to the student or pupil.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35351.

No public school pupil shall be assigned to or be required to attend a particular school because of the characteristics listed in Section 220.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Los Angeles Unified School District [35400. - 35401.]

35400.

(a) The Los Angeles Unified School District’s Inspector General of the Office of the Inspector General may conduct audits and investigations. The inspector general may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths or affirmations, take testimony, and compel the production of all information, documents, reports, answers, records, accounts, papers, and other data and documentary evidence deemed material and relevant and that reasonably relate to the inquiry or investigation undertaken by the inspector general when the inspector general has a reasonable suspicion that a law, regulation, rule, or school district policy has been violated or is being violated. For purposes of this section, “reasonable suspicion” means that the circumstances known or apparent to the
 inspector general include specific and articulable facts causing the inspector general to suspect that a material violation of law, regulation, rule, or school district policy has occurred or is occurring, and that the facts would cause a reasonable officer in a like position to suspect that a material violation of a law, regulation, rule, or school district policy has occurred or is occurring.

(b) Subpoenas shall be served in the manner provided by law for service of summons. A subpoena issued pursuant to this section may be subject to challenge pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1985) of Title 3 of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) For purposes of this section, Sections 11184, 11185, 11186, 11187, 11188, 11189, 11190, and 11191 of the Government Code shall
 apply to the subpoenaing of witnesses and documents, reports, answers, records, accounts, papers, and other data and documentary evidence as if the investigation was being conducted by a state department head, except that the applicable court for resolving motions to compel or motions to quash shall be the Superior Court for the County of Los Angeles.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who, after the administration of an oath or affirmation pursuant to this section, states or affirms as true any material matter that the person knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months or by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment for the first offense. Any subsequent violation shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to
 exceed one year or by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(e) (1) The inspector general shall submit to the Legislature, on or before July 1 of each year, an annual report on all of the following:

(A) The use and effectiveness of the subpoena power authorized by this section in the successful completion of the inspector general’s duties.

(B) Any use of the subpoena power in which the issued subpoena was quashed, including the basis for the court’s order.

(C) Any referral to the local district attorney or the Attorney General where the district attorney or Attorney General declined to
 investigate the matter further or declined to prosecute.

(2) A report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 871, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

35400.5.

(a) The inspector general shall be appointed by the Board of Education of the Los Angeles Unified School District for a term of three years, subject to the terms of the inspector general’s employment contract.

(b) (1) The inspector general shall conform to the Principles and Standards for Offices of Inspector General, published by the Association of Inspectors General.

(2) Audits performed by the inspector general shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, including either the Generally Accepted Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States, or the International Standards for the Professional Practice of Internal Auditing issued by The Institute of Internal Auditors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 871, Sec. 2.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

35401.

(a) If the inspector general determines that there is reasonable cause to believe that an employee or outside agency has engaged in any illegal activity, he or she shall report the nature and details of the activity on a timely basis to the local district attorney or the Attorney General.

(b) The inspector general does not have any enforcement power.

(c) Every investigation, including, but not limited to, all investigative files and work-product, shall be kept confidential, except that the inspector general may issue any report of an investigation that has been substantiated, keeping confidential the identity of the individual or individuals involved, or release any findings resulting from an investigation conducted pursuant to this article that is deemed necessary to serve the interests of the district.

(d) This section does not limit any authority conferred upon the Attorney General or any other department or agency of government to investigate any matter.

(e) Except as authorized in this section, or if called upon to testify in any court or proceeding at law, any disclosure of information by the inspector general or that office that was acquired pursuant to a subpoena of the private books, documents, or papers of the person subpoenaed, is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Reorganization of School Districts—General Provisions [35500. - 35586.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Intent and Purpose [35500. - 35501.]

35500.

It is the intent of the Legislature to utilize the organization of districts as they existed on January 1, 1981, and local educational needs and concerns shall serve as the basis for future reorganization of districts in each county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35501.

On and after January 1, 1981, this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 35700) shall apply to an action to reorganize school districts.
